Washington statutes.
RCW 36.120.050

Planning committee—Taxes, fees, and tolls.

(1) A regional transportation investment district planning committee may, as part of a regional transportation investment plan, recommend the imposition or authorization of some or all of the following revenue sources, which a regional transportation investment district may impose or authorize upon approval of the voters as provided in this chapter:

(a) A regional sales and use tax, as specified in RCW 82.14.430, of up to 0.1 percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax, upon the occurrence of any taxable event in the regional transportation investment district;

(b) A local option vehicle license fee, as specified under RCW 82.80.100, of up to one hundred dollars per vehicle registered in the district. As used in this subsection, "vehicle" means motor vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.320. Certain classes of vehicles, as defined under chapter 46.04 RCW, may be exempted from this fee;

(c) A parking tax under RCW 82.80.030;

(d) A local motor vehicle excise tax under RCW 81.100.060;

(e) A local option fuel tax under RCW 82.80.120;

(f) An employer excise tax under RCW 81.100.030; and

(g) Vehicle tolls on new or reconstructed local or regional arterials or state routes within the boundaries of the district, if the following conditions are met:

(i) Consistent with RCW 47.56.820, the vehicle toll must first be authorized by the legislature if the toll is imposed on a state route;

(ii) Consistent with RCW 47.56.850, the vehicle toll, including any change in an existing toll rate, must first be reviewed and approved by the tolling authority designated in RCW 47.56.850 if the toll, or change in toll rate, would have a significant impact, as determined by the tolling authority, on the operation of any state facility;

(iii) The regional transportation investment plan must identify the facilities that may be tolled; and

(iv) Unless otherwise specified by law, the department shall administer the collection of vehicle tolls on designated facilities, and the state transportation commission, or its successor, shall be the tolling authority, and shall act in accordance with RCW 47.56.850.

(2) Taxes, fees, and tolls may not be imposed or authorized without an affirmative vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of the district voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in RCW 36.120.070. Revenues from these taxes and fees may be used only to implement the plan as set forth in this chapter. A district may contract with the state department of revenue or other appropriate entities for administration and collection of any of the taxes or fees authorized in this section.

(3) Existing statewide motor vehicle fuel and special fuel taxes, at the distribution rates in effect on January 1, 2001, are not intended to be altered by this chapter.

[ 2008 c 122 s 16; 2006 c 311 s 13; 2003 c 350 s 4; 2002 c 56 s 105.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 311: See note following RCW 36.120.020.